Maryland, session 2026, SB0236.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
9–107.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “ELECTION–SUPPORTING TECHNOLOGY”
MEANS ANY EQUIPMENT OR TECHNOLOGY THAT IS:
(I) COMPATIBLE WITH A METHOD OF CASTING AND
TABULATING VOTES IN WHICH VOTERS RANK CANDIDATES IN ORDER OF
PREFERENCE AND VOTES ARE TABULATED IN A MANNER THAT REFLECTS VOTER
PREFERENCE; AND
(II) DESIGNED FOR USE IN THE ADMINISTRATION OF
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0236*

SENATE BILL 236
ELECTIONS, INCLUDING:
1. ELECTRONIC POLLBOOKS;
2. RISK–LIMITING AUDIT TOOLS; AND
3. ANY SOFTWARE USED FOR PREPARING, PRESENTING,
OR REPORTING THE RESULTS PRODUCED BY A VOTING SYSTEM.
(2) “ELECTION–SUPPORTING TECHNOLOGY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
VOTING SYSTEM.
(B) THE STATE BOARD SHALL:
(1) ADOPT REGULATIONS:
(I) FOR THE REVIEW, CERTIFICATION, AND DECERTIFICATION
OF ELECTION–SUPPORTING TECHNOLOGY; AND
(II) RELATING TO REQUIREMENTS FOR ELECTION–SUPPORTING
TECHNOLOGY SELECTED AND CERTIFIED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2027,
REVIEW AND EVALUATE ELECTION–SUPPORTING TECHNOLOGY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the State Board of Elections
shall adopt the regulations required under § 9–107 of the Election Law Article, as enacted
by Section 1 of this Act, on or before December 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.